Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6044
Nursing Home Advisory Council; created; duties.

There is hereby established a Nursing Home Advisory Council to advise and assist the department in carrying out the administration of the Health Care Facility Licensure Act and the rules, regulations, and standards adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto, as the same apply to nursing homes.

Laws 1967, c. 452, § 2, p. 1400;

Laws 1982, LB 566, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-2032;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 130.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.